Utah statutes.
10-5-120.   Loans between funds -- Bonds purchased by funds.

Subject to restrictions imposed by bond ordinance, statute, or other controlling regulations, the council may (1) authorize interfund loans from one fund to another at such interest rates and upon such repayment terms and conditions as it may prescribe, and (2) with available cash in any fund, purchase or otherwise acquire for investment unmatured bonds of the town or of any fund of the town.



Enacted by Chapter 34, 1983 General Session

